Hawaii, session 2025, HB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that post-secondary students should be able to access resources that help them meet their basic needs.  Basic needs include access to stable housing, food, and healthcare services. The legislature further finds that the State should help ensure that post-secondary students have access to these basic needs while pursuing higher education. The legislature additionally finds that the State must work towards breaking barriers to access in order to create a more just and accessible system of higher education. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish: (1)  A homeless student stability program; (2)  A homeless student housing resource program; (3)  A minimum of one benefits navigator position at each university of Hawaii system campus; and (4)  A position within the university of Hawaii system to coordinate campus positions and initiatives. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding three new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-     Homeless student stability program; established.  (a)  There is established within the university of Hawaii a homeless student stability program to provide grants to campuses within the university of Hawaii system to increase identification and support of post-secondary students experiencing homelessness. (b)  Campuses may use grants awarded through the program to support students experiencing homelessness by: (1)  Identifying students that may be impacted by homelessness; (2)  Identifying potential community resources and organizational partnerships; (3)  Providing resources to support students' basic needs, including retail store gift cards, groceries, and hygiene items; (4)  Providing students with supplemental learning resources, including tutoring; (5)  Reimbursing students for healthcare expenses, including behavioral health expenses; (6)  Reimbursing students for temporary housing expenses, such as short-term hotel or motel stays; and (7)  Helping students access employment and job-training resources. (c)  The university shall award grants based on criteria that shall be developed by the board of regents.  The criteria shall be based on the demonstrated need of the campuses, the number or overall percentage of homeless students enrolled in each campus, and the ability of campuses to meet the needs of their homeless student population. The university shall prioritize awarding grants to campuses that demonstrate a commitment to: (1)  Partnering with local community-based organizations with experience in serving the needs of students experiencing homelessness or students of color, with a preference for organizations that focus on equitable housing and homelessness reduction strategies; and (2)  Implementing evidence-informed strategies to address the opportunity gap and inequities that negatively impact students experiencing homelessness.  Specific strategies may include, but are not limited to: (A)  Enhancing the cultural responsiveness of current and future staff; (B)  Ensuring all staff, faculty, and school employees are actively trained in trauma-informed care; (C)  Using a multidisciplinary approach when serving students experiencing homelessness and their families; (D)  Intentionally seeking and utilizing input from students experiencing homelessness about how different policies, services, and practices can be improved; and (E)  Identifying data and systems needed to monitor progress in eliminating disparities in academic outcomes. (d)  Funds allocated for the purposes of this section shall not be used to replace any existing federal, state, or county resources that support students experiencing homelessness. (e)  At the end of each academic year, campuses receiving grants shall submit a report on the academic outcomes of the students supported through the program to the university.  The university shall review the reports and assist campuses in making necessary adjustments to grant usage based on the results of the reports. §304A-     Homeless student housing resource program; established.  (a) There is established within the university of Hawaii a homeless student housing resource program to provide grants to housing support organizations that partner with university of Hawaii system campuses to help students and their attached family unit that is experiencing homelessness secure stable housing located near the campus that the student experiencing homelessness attends. (b)  Housing support organizations awarded grants pursuant to this section may use those funds to support the students and their attached family unit that is experiencing homelessness through activities including, but not limited to the following: (1)  Rental assistance, including utilities, security and utility deposits, first and last month's rent, rental application fees, moving expenses, and other housing expenses as determined by the university; (2)  Transportation assistance, including gasoline assistance and bus passes; (3)  Emergency shelter; (4)  Housing stability case management; and (5)  Homelessness prevention. (c) The university may contract with a third party to provide technical assistance, conduct evaluations of prospective grantees, and assist with the awarding of grants.  At a minimum, the third party shall: (1)  Be a non-profit organization; (2)  Be located and registered in the State; and (3)  Have a demonstrated record of working toward the housing and educational stability of students and families experiencing homelessness. (d)  The university, or the third party in consultation with the university, shall develop an application and grant process to award grants to housing support organizations.  Applications for the program shall include a letter of support from the campus that the organization intends to partner with.  Within sixty days of being awarded a grant, a memorandum of understanding shall be established between the housing support organization and campus, which defines the responsibilities and commitments of each party in identifying, housing, and supporting students experiencing homelessness.  At a minimum, the memorandum of understanding shall address how: (1)  Housing support organizations will partner with the campus to address the needs of homeless students and develop sustainable strategies to house students experiencing homelessness; and (2)  Data on students experiencing homelessness will be collected and shared in accordance with relevant privacy laws and protections. (e)  In awarding grants, the university shall ensure that any housing support organization receiving a grant reflects geographic diversity across the State.  The university shall prioritize awarding grants to housing support organizations that demonstrate a commitment to: (1)  Establishing partnerships with university of Hawaii system campuses; and (2)  Developing and implementing evidence-informed strategies to address racial inequities.  Specific strategies may include, but are not limited to the following: (A)  Hiring direct service staff who reflect the racial, cultural, and language demographics of the population being served; (B)  Committing to inclusive programming by intentionally seeking and utilizing input from the population being served; (C)  Ensuring eligibility criteria does not unintentionally exclude people of color and further racial inequity; and (D)  Creating access points in locations frequented by parents, guardians, and homeless students of color. (f)  Housing support organizations awarded grants pursuant to this section shall report beneficiary information to the university, including the: (1)  Length of time beneficiaries have been receiving benefits under the program; (2)  Housing destination following expiration of program benefits; (3)  Type of residence prior to receiving program benefits; and (4)  Number of times the beneficiaries were homeless in the past three years. (g)  The university, or the third party contracted pursuant to subsection (c), shall conduct a program review every two years.  The program review shall evaluate the process used by housing support organizations to identify and conduct outreach to students experiencing homelessness and any other indicators that assess the effectiveness of housing support organizations in meeting the housing needs of students experiencing homelessness. (h)  For the purposes of this section: "Attached family unit" means family members that live with the student. "Beneficiary" means a student and the student's attached family unit, if applicable, that is assisted by a housing support organization that has been awarded a grant pursuant to this section. "Housing support organization" means a housing authority, behavioral health organization, community-based non-profit organization, or non-profit organization with a focus on housing or homelessness. §304A-     Hunger free and basic needs strategic plan; benefits navigator.  (a) There shall be established a minimum of one benefits navigator position in each university of Hawaii system campus to assist students in accessing public benefits, existing emergency assistance programs, and other community resources.  Each benefits navigator shall be located at a single location on campus where students are directed to receive assistance.  Each campus, in coordination with respective benefits navigator, shall develop a hunger-free and basic needs campus strategic plan.  Each strategic plan shall: (1)  Include policy proposals for campus food pantries, if such policies have not already been established; (2)  Include an analysis of existing food pantry policies that evaluates the accessibility to students; (3)  Review and update methods to identify low-income and food-insecure students; (4)  Create a communications and outreach strategy to promote existing food and nutrition benefits assistance programs; (5)  Identify opportunities for partnerships with community-based organizations; and (6)  Assess the need for additional state or federal funding to support the basic needs of students. (b)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the university shall develop and disseminate by September 30 each year a survey of students enrolled at each university of Hawaii system to assess food security, housing security, and access to basic economic support. The university shall publish the results of the survey by December 31, 2025, and each year thereafter. (c)  Campuses shall submit an annual report to the board of regents on the outcomes of the establishment of the benefits navigator position and findings from respective hunger-free and basic needs campus strategic plans." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii to fund and administer homelessness and basic needs support services for post-secondary students; provided that the sums appropriated shall be expended as follows: (1)  $ for the homeless student stability program; (2)  $ for the homeless student housing resource program; (3)  $ for the establishment of a minimum one benefits navigator position in each university of Hawaii system campus; and (4)  $ for the establishment of one position within the university of Hawaii system to coordinate campus positions and initiatives. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________